apertium-hun.hun.dix
     <pardef n="kérdés__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sel</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hez</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ünk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ük</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- cs ccs -->
    <pardef n="á/cs__n">
        <e><p><l>cs</l><r>cs<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>csot</l><r>cs<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>csnak</l><r>cs<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ccsal</l><r>cs<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>csban</l><r>cs<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>cshoz</l><r>cs<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>csba</l><r>cs<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>csnál</l><r>cs<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>cson</l><r>cs<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>csa</l><r>cs<s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>csunk</l><r>cs<s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>csuk</l><r>cs<s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- gy ggy -->
    <pardef n="a/gy__n">
        <e><p><l>gy</l><r>gy<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>gyat</l><r>gy<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>gynak</l><r>gy<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ggyal</l><r>gy<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>gyban</l><r>gy<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>gyhoz</l><r>gy<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>gyba</l><r>gy<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>gynál</l><r>gy<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>gyon</l><r>gy<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>gya</l><r>gy<s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gyunk</l><r>gy<s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gyuk</l><r>gy<s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
     <!-- ly lly -->
    <pardef n="akadá/ly__n">
        <e><p><l>ly</l><r>ly<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>lyt</l><r>ly<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>lynak</l><r>ly<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>llyal</l><r>ly<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>lyban</l><r>ly<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>lyhoz</l><r>ly<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>lyba</l><r>ly<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>lynál</l><r>ly<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>lyon</l><r>ly<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>lya</l><r>ly<s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lyunk</l><r>ly<s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lyuk</l><r>ly<s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- ny nny -->
    <pardef n="ara/ny__n">
        <e><p><l>ny</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyat</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nynak</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nnyal</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyban</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyhoz</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyba</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nynál</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyon</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>nya</l><r>ny<s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nyunk</l><r>ny<s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nyuk</l><r>ny<s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ablak__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ot</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>kal</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hoz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>on</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uk</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="bank__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ot</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>kal</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hoz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>on</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>juk</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
     <pardef n="ár/ok__n">
        <e><p><l>ok</l><r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>kot</l><r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>oknak</l><r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>okkal</l><r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>okban</l><r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>okhoz</l><r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>okba</l><r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>oknál</l><r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>kon</l><r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>ka</l><r>ok<s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kunk</l><r>ok<s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kuk</l><r>ok<s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ablak"><i>ablak</i><par n="ablak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ács"><i>á</i><par n="á/cs__n"/></e>
    <e lm="agancs"><i>agan</i><par n="á/cs__n"/></e>
    <e lm="agy"><i>a</i><par n="a/gy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ágy"><i>á</i><par n="a/gy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akadály"><i>akadá</i><par n="akadá/ly__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akadály"><i>akadá</i><par n="akadá/ly__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arany"><i>ara</i><par n="ara/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="árnyék"><i>árnyék</i><par n="ablak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="árok"><i>ár</i><par n="ár/ok__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bakancs"><i>bakan</i><par n="á/cs__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bank"><i>bank</i><par n="bank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barack"><i>barack</i><par n="bank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="betegágy"><i>betegá</i><par n="a/gy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bibircsók"><i>bibircsók</i><par n="bank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bogáncs"><i>bogán</i><par n="á/cs__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bók"><i>bók</i><par n="bank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boríték"><i>boríték</i><par n="ablak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buborék"><i>buborék</i><par n="ablak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csapatjáték"><i>csapatjáték</i><par n="ablak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csók"><i>csók</i><par n="bank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csónak"><i>csónak</i><par n="bank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csonk"><i>csonk</i><par n="bank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="játék"><i>játék</i><par n="ablak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kérdés"><i>kérdés</i><par n="kérdés__n"/></e>
